dictsource/mi_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// Māori

// vowels

.group a
             a            a
             ae	aI
             ai	aI
             ao	aU
             au	au"

.group ā
             ā            a:

.group e
             e            e

.group ē
             ē            e:

.group i
             i            i

.group ī
             ī            i:

.group o
             o            O
             oe	we
             oi	oI
             ou	ou"

.group ō
             ō            O:

.group u
             u            u"

.group ū
             ū            u":

// consonants

.group h
             h            h
             h"           hf
.group k
             k            k

.group m
             m            m

.group n
             n            n
             ng           N

.group p
             p            p

.group r
             r            R

.group t
             t            t

.group w
             w            w
             wh           f
